North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 7B. Legislative Analysis Division.

§ 120-36.8.
Certification of legislation required by federal law.

Every bill and resolution introduced in the General Assembly proposing any change in the law which purports to implement federal law or to be required or necessary for compliance with federal law, or on which is conditioned the receipt of federal funds shall have attached to it at the time of its consideration by the General Assembly a certification prepared by the Legislative Analysis Division, in consultation with the Legislative Drafting and Fiscal Research Divisions, identifying the federal law requiring passage of the bill or resolution. The certification shall contain a statement setting forth the reasons why the bill or resolution is required by federal law. If the bill or resolution is not required by federal law or exceeds the requirements of federal law, then the certification shall state the reasons for that opinion. No comment or opinion shall be included in the certification with regard to the merits of the measure for which the certification is prepared. However, technical and mechanical defects may be noted.

The sponsor of each bill or resolution to which this section applies shall present a copy of the bill or resolution with the request for certification to the Legislative Analysis Division. Upon receipt of the request and the copy of the bill or resolution, the Legislative Analysis Division shall consult with the Legislative Drafting and Fiscal Research Divisions, and may consult with the Office of State Budget and Management or any State agency on preparation of the certification as promptly as possible. The Legislative Analysis Division shall prepare the certification and transmit it to the sponsor within two weeks after the request is made, unless the sponsor agrees to an extension of time.

This certification shall be attached to the original of each proposed bill or resolution that is reported favorably by any committee of the General Assembly, but shall be separate from the bill or resolution and shall be clearly designated as a certification. A certification attached to a bill or resolution pursuant to this section is not a part of the bill or resolution and is not an expression of legislative intent proposed by the bill or resolution.

If a committee of the General Assembly reports favorably a proposed bill or resolution with an amendment proposing any change in the law which purports to implement federal law or to be required or necessary for compliance with federal law, the chair of the committee shall obtain from the Legislative Analysis Division and attach to the amended bill or resolution a certification as provided in this section.

History.

1995, c. 415, s. 8; 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2001-487, s. 79; 2018-142, s. 4(f).

§§ 120-36.9,
120-36.10.

Reserved for future codification purposes.